Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.003

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "City" means an incorporated city or town.

(2) "Contracting city" means any city that contracts with a hosting jurisdiction for the delivery of judicial services.

(3) "Hosting jurisdiction" means a county or city designated in an interlocal agreement as receiving compensation for providing judicial services to a contracting city.

(4) "Mayor" means the mayor, city manager, or other chief administrative officer of the city.

[ 2008 c 227 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 125.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 227: "This act takes effect July 1, 2008." [ 2008 c 227 s 13.]

Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: "Subheadings used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2008 c 227 s 14.]

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.